Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-763
Official in charge of penal or correctional institution; duties.

It shall be lawful and mandatory upon the warden or other official in charge of a penal or correctional institution in this state to give over the person of any inmate thereof whenever so required by the operation of the Agreement on Detainers.

Laws 1963, c. 154, § 5, p. 552.